en: Sparkling ciders, sparkling cider
de: Sprudelnde Apfelweine, Apfelschaumwein, Apfelperlwein
fr: Cidres bouchés, Cidre bouché
hr: Pjenušava jabukovača
it: Sidri frizzanti, Sidro frizzante
nl: Mousserende ciders

fr: Cidres de glace, Cidre de glace
de: Cidre de Glace, Eis-Cidre
nl: IJsciders

en: Dry ciders
fr: Cidres bruts, Cidre brut

en: Half-dry ciders
de: Cidre halbtrocken
fr: Cidres demi-secs, Cidre demi-sec, Cidres bouchés demi-secs, Cidre bouché demi-sec
hr: Polusuhi cideri
nl: Halfdroge ciders

en: Sweet ciders, sweet cider
de: Süße Apfelweine
es: Sidras dulces, Sidra dulce
fi: makeat siiderit
fr: Cidres doux, Cidre doux
hr: Slatki cideri
it: Sidro dolce, Sidri dolci
nl: Zoete ciders

en: Pink ciders
de: Rosé Cidre
fr: Cidres rosés
hr: Ružičasti cideri
it: Cidri rosati, Cidro rosato, Cidri rosè, Cidro rosè, Cidri rosé, Cidro rosé
nl: Roséciders
pl: Cydr różowy

en: Flavoured ciders
fr: Cidres aromatisés

en: Cherry flavoured ciders
fr: Cidres aromatisés cerise

en: Raspberry flavoured ciders
fr: Cidres aromatisés framboise, Cidres aromatisés à la framboise

en: Traditional ciders
de: Traditioneller Cidre
fr: Cidres traditionnels
hr: Tradicionalni cideri
it: Sidri tradizionali, Sidro tradizionale
nl: Traditionele ciders, Appelwijnen

en: Perry, pear cider
fr: Poiré, jus de poires fermenté, Boisson fermentée à base de poires

en: Kir Royal, Kir Royale, Champagne kir, Cocktail of champagne with red fruit liqueur
fr: Kir royal, Kir au champagne, Kir royal au champagne

en: Kir, Cocktail of white wine with red fruit liqueur
fr: Kir au vin blanc

en: Schnapps
de: Schnäppse, Schnäpse, Schnapps, Schnaps
fi: Snapsit
fr: schnaps
hr: Šnaps
hu: Snapsz, Schnapps, Schnaps
it: Schnapps, Schnaps
ja: シュナップス
lt: Šnapsas, Šnapsai
nl: Schapps

en: Klarer
de: Klarer, Klarer Schnaps

en: Rakia
ar: راكيا
be: Ракія
bg: Ракия
bs: Rakija
ca: Rakia
cs: Rakije
cy: Racia
da: Rakia
de: Rakija
el: Ρακή
es: Rakia
et: Rakia
eu: Rakia
fr: Rakija
he: ראקיה
hr: Rakija
hu: Rakija, Raki
hy: Ռակիա
id: Rakia
it: Rakija
ja: ラキヤ
ko: 라키야
lt: Rakija
mk: Ракија
nl: Rakija
nn: Rakia
pl: Rakija
pt: Rakija
ru: Ракия
sh: Rakija
sq: Rakia
sr: Ракија
sv: Rakia
tr: Rakiya
uk: Ракія
zh: 拉基亞

en: Punchs
fr: Punchs

en: Punch cocktail with 16% alcohol, Punch with 16% alcohol
fr: Cocktail type punch à 16% d'alcool, Punch à 16% d'alcool

en: Rum-based cocktail
fr: Cocktail à base de rhum
hu: Rumalapú koktélok
nl: Cocktails op basis van rum

en: Daiquiri
xx: Daiquiri
ar: ديكري
be: Дайкіры
bg: Дайкири
ca: Daikiri
el: Ντάκιρι
eo: Dajkirio
fa: دایکیری
fr: daïquiri, daiquiri
he: דאקירי
hu: Daiquiri
ja: ダイキリ
ka: დაიკირი
ko: 다이키리
ml: ഡേയ്ക്കിരി
ru: Дайкири
uk: Дайкірі
zh: 黛綺莉